Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-816
Violation; company officers; personal liability.

Every president, treasurer, general manager, agent, or other person usually exercising the powers of such officers of any corporation, joint-stock company, limited liability company, or other association who has himself or herself, in its behalf, violated, united to violate, or voted for or consented to the violation of sections 59-801 to 59-831 shall thereafter be personally liable for all the debts and obligations of any such corporation, joint-stock company, limited liability company, or other association created while such person holds such office or agency, whether under the same or subsequent elections or appointments.

Laws 1905, c. 162, § 13, p. 641;

R.S.1913, § 4057;

C.S.1922, § 3460;

C.S.1929, § 59-813;

R.S.1943, § 59-816;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 371;

Laws 2002, LB 1278, § 7.